Arkansas, session 2025, HB1884.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-601(i), concerning the form of paper
ballots, is amended to read as follows:
(i) Each paper ballot to be hand counted shall contain a watermark or
an ultraviolet ink seal on the ballot with a unique placement of the
watermark or an ultraviolet ink seal for each election cycle.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-603(4), concerning the counting of
paper ballots, is amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) Upon Except as otherwise provided under subdivision
(4)(E) of this section, upon the close of the polls, the poll workers
immediately shall certify and attest the list of voters and continue the
count to completion, within twenty-four (24) hours of the close of the polls,
and with no significant breaks in the counting process.
(B)(i) A hand count of paper ballots shall be completed a
minimum of twenty-four (24) hours before the certification deadline.
(ii) If the hand count of paper ballots is not
completed a minimum of twenty-four (24) hours before the certification
deadline, the machine tabulated results under subdivision (1) of this section
*SSS211*
03/20/2025 2:14:58 PM SSS211

HB1884
shall be the certified results of the election.
(C)(i) If a poll worker becomes sick or incapacitated from
any other cause, the remaining poll workers shall continue the count until it
is completed.
(ii) The county board of election commissioners
shall ensure there is a minimum of four (4) poll workers available to
continue the count.
(D) All hand-count paper ballot totals shall be recorded
by race in each precinct, and posted at the designated hand-count location
upon the completion of the hand count of the paper ballots.
(E) Poll workers may be exempt from counting to completion
under this subdivision (4)(A) if, while the paper ballots are not being
counted, the paper ballots:
(i) Remain sealed in a double-locking hard shell
ballot box; and
(ii) Are stored in a locked room that is guarded by
a sheriff's deputy at all times;



















03/20/2025 2:14:58 PM SSS211